Utah statutes.
34-45-103.   Protection of certain activities -- Firearms -- Free exercise of religion.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a person may not establish, maintain, or enforce any policy or rule that has the effect of:

(a)  prohibiting any individual from transporting or storing a firearm in a motor vehicle on any property designated for motor vehicle parking, if:

(i)  the individual is legally permitted to transport, possess, purchase, receive, transfer, or store the firearm;

(ii)  the firearm is locked securely in the motor vehicle or in a locked container attached to the motor vehicle while the motor vehicle is not occupied; and

(iii)  the firearm is not in plain view from the outside of the motor vehicle; or

(b)  prohibiting any individual from possessing any item in or on a motor vehicle on any property designated for motor vehicle parking, if the effect of the policy or rule constitutes a substantial burden on that individual's free exercise of religion.

(2)  A person may establish, maintain, or enforce a policy or rule that has the effect of placing limitations on or prohibiting an individual from transporting or storing a firearm in a motor vehicle on property the person has designated for motor vehicle parking if:

(a)  the person provides, or there is otherwise available, one of the following, in a location reasonably proximate to the property the person has designated for motor vehicle parking:

(i)  alternative parking for individuals who desire to transport, possess, receive, transfer, or store a firearm in the individual's motor vehicle at no additional cost to the individual; or

(ii)  a secured and monitored storage location where the individual may securely store a firearm before proceeding with the vehicle into the secured parking area; or

(b)  the person complies with Subsection 34-45-107(5).

